Rhode Island statutes. Title 40.1 Behavioral Healthcare, Developmental Disabilities and Hospitals
Chapter 5 Mental Health Law

40.1-5-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known as the “Mental Health Law.”

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 100, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

40-20-1

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 1974, ch. 119, § 1.

40.1-5-2.
Definitions.

Whenever used in this chapter, or in any order, rule, or regulation made or promulgated pursuant to this chapter, or in any printed forms prepared by the department or the director, unless otherwise expressly stated, or unless the context or subject matter otherwise requires:

“Alternatives to admission or certification” means alternatives to a particular facility or treatment program, and shall include, but not be limited to, voluntary or court-ordered outpatient treatment, day treatment in a hospital, night treatment in a hospital, placement in the custody of a friend or relative, placement in a nursing home, referral to a community mental health clinic and home health aide services, or any other services that may be deemed appropriate.

“Care and treatment” means psychiatric care, together with such medical, nursing, psychological, social, rehabilitative, and maintenance services as may be required by a patient in association with the psychiatric care provided pursuant to an individualized treatment plan recorded in the patient’s medical record.

“Department” means the state department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals.

“Director” means the director of the state department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals.

“Facility” means any public or private hospital licensed by the Rhode Island department of health that maintains staff and facilities, including inpatient units, for the care and treatment of persons with psychiatric illness, psychiatric disorders, and/or psychiatric disabilities; and in order to operate pursuant to the Mental Health Act as codified in this chapter, such facility and/or inpatient unit must be approved by the director of the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals upon application of such facility and/or inpatient unit, and any of the several community mental health services established pursuant to chapter 8.5 of this title. Nothing contained herein shall be construed to amend or repeal any of the provisions of chapter 16 of title 23.

The Eleanor Slater hospital shall be required to apply to the department for approval from the director to operate pursuant to this chapter.

The Rhode Island state psychiatric hospital shall be required to apply to the department for approval from the director to operate pursuant to this chapter.

“Indigent person” means a person who has not sufficient property or income to support himself or herself, and to support the members of his or her family dependent upon him or her for support, and/or is unable to pay the fees and costs incurred pursuant to any legal proceedings conducted under the provisions of this chapter.

“Likelihood of serious harm” means:

A substantial risk of physical harm to the person himself or herself as manifested by behavior evidencing serious threats of, or attempts at, suicide;

A substantial risk of physical harm to other persons as manifested by behavior or threats evidencing homicidal or other violent behavior; or

A substantial risk of physical harm to the mentally disabled person as manifested by behavior that has created a grave, clear, and present risk to the person’s physical health and safety.

In determining whether there exists a likelihood of serious harm, the physician and the court may consider previous acts, diagnosis, words, or thoughts of the patient. If a patient has been incarcerated, or institutionalized, or in a controlled environment of any kind, the court may give great weight to such prior acts, diagnosis, words, or thoughts.

“Mental health professional” means a psychiatrist, psychologist, or social worker and such other persons, including psychiatric nurse clinicians, as may be defined by rules and regulations promulgated by the director.

“NICS database” means the National Instant Criminal Background Check System as created pursuant to section 103(b) of the Brady Handgun Violence Prevention Act (Brady Act), Pub. L. No. 103-159, 107 Stat. 1536 as established by 28 C.F.R. 25.1.

“Patient” means a person admitted voluntarily, certified or re-certified admitted to a facility according to the provisions of this chapter.

“Physician” means a person licensed by the Rhode Island department of health to practice medicine pursuant to chapter 37 of title 5.

“Psychiatric disability” means a mental disorder in which the capacity of a person to exercise self-control or judgment in the conduct of the person’s affairs and social relations, or to care for the person’s own personal needs, is significantly impaired.

“Psychiatric nurse clinician” means a professional registered nurse with a master’s degree in psychiatric nursing or related field who is licensed by the Rhode Island department of health pursuant to chapter 34 of title 5 and who is currently working in the mental health field as defined by the American Nurses Association, and/or a licensed advanced practice registered nurse with a population focus of psychiatric/mental health population focus as defined in paragraphs (2) and (12)(vi) of §

5-34-3

.

“Psychiatrist” means a person licensed by the Rhode Island department of health to practice medicine pursuant to chapter 37 of title 5 who has, in addition, completed three (3) years of graduate psychiatric training in a program approved by the American Medical Association or American Osteopathic Association.

“Psychologist” means a person licensed by the Rhode Island department of health pursuant to chapter 44 of title 5.

“Social worker” means a person who has a masters or further advanced degree from a school of social work, that is accredited by the council of social work education and who is licensed by the Rhode Island department of health pursuant to chapter 39.1 of title 5.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 100, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

40-20-2

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 1974, ch. 119, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 203, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 215, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 345, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 173, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 216, § 28; P.L. 2014, ch. 423, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 455, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 79, art. 1, § 38; P.L. 2022, ch. 231, art. 11, § 7, effective June 27, 2022.

40.1-5-3.
General powers and duties of state department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals.

The state department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals is charged with the execution of the laws relating to the admission and custody of the mentally disabled.

Under the direction of the state director of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals, he or she, or one or more of his or her assistants or representatives so designated, shall visit the several facilities in the department and others as are approved to function under this chapter for the purpose of determining whether the provisions of this chapter relating to custody and admission of mentally disabled persons are being complied with. For these purposes, the director is empowered to subpoena witnesses; compel their attendance; administer oaths to witnesses; examine witnesses under oath; and require the production of any books, documents, papers, or records deemed relevant to the inquiry of investigation. A subpoena issued under this section shall be regulated by the civil practice laws and rules.

In licensing, regulating, inspecting, and investigating facilities as defined in this chapter pursuant to the provisions of chapter 16 of title 23, the department of health shall engage independent qualified experts in mental health treatment and in the administration of mental health facilities, and shall license only facilities accredited in accordance with the joint commission on accreditation of hospitals standards for psychiatric facilities and which continue to meet such standards.

Under the direction of the state director of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals, the state department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals may:

Examine all facilities, public and private, authorized by law to receive, admit, educate, and care for the mentally disabled; and

Inquire into their methods of government and the management of all persons therein; and

Examine into the condition of all buildings, grounds, and other property connected with the facility, and into all matters relating to its management.

For the purposes set forth under subsection (d), the director may:

Have free access to the grounds, buildings, and all books and records relating to any facility; and

Be entitled to receive from all persons connected in any way with the facility, information and assistance for any examination or inquiry as the director may require.

The director may, by order, appoint a competent person to examine the books and papers and also the general condition and management of any facility to the extent deemed necessary and specified in the order.

The director may adopt rules and regulations governing the management of facilities, both public and private, as he or she may deem necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter to insure the comfort and promote the welfare of the patients.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 100, § 1; P.L. 1968, ch. 168, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 40-20-3; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 1974, ch. 119, § 1.

40.1-5-4.
Delegation of authority by director.

Unless otherwise herein expressly provided, whenever any duty pursuant hereto devolves upon the director of the state department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals or the director of the state health department, he or she may, in writing, delegate the performance of the duty to a deputy or agent, and the delegated action by the deputy or agent shall be deemed to be the action of the director. However, the director shall expressly ratify the action within fourteen (14) days, and failure to so ratify the delegated action shall be deemed non-action or nonperformance of the duty of the director.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 100, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 40-20-5; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; G.L. 1956, §

40.1-5-5

; P.L. 1974, ch. 119, § 1.

40.1-5-5.
Admission of patients generally — Rights of patients — Patients’ records — Competence of patients.

Admissions. Any person who is in need of care and treatment in a facility, as herein defined, may be admitted or certified, received, and retained as a patient in a facility by complying with any one of the following admission procedures applicable to the case:

Voluntary admission.

Emergency certification.

Civil court certification.

Forms. The director shall prescribe and furnish forms for use in admissions and patient notification procedures under this chapter.

Exclusions. No person with a psychiatric disability, or person under the influence of alcohol or drugs shall be certified to a facility, as herein defined, solely by reason of that condition, unless the person also qualified for admission or certification under the provisions of this chapter.

Examining physician. For purposes of certification, no examining physician shall be related by blood or marriage to the person who is applying for the admission of another, or to the person who is the subject of the application; nor shall he or she have any interest, contractually, testamentary, or otherwise (other than reasonable and proper charges for professional services rendered), in or against the estate or assets of the person who is the subject of the application; nor shall he or she be a manager, trustee, visitor, proprietor, officer, stockholder, or have any pecuniary interest, directly or indirectly, or, except as otherwise herein expressly provided, be a director, resident physician, or salaried physician, or employee in any facility to which it is proposed to admit the person.

Certificates. Certificates, as required by this chapter, must provide a factual description of the person’s behavior that indicates that the person concerned is psychiatrically disabled, creates a likelihood of serious harm, and is in need of care and treatment in a facility as defined in this chapter. They shall further set forth such other findings as may be required by the particular certification procedure used. Certificates shall also show that an examination of the person concerned was made within five (5) days prior to the date of admission or certification, unless otherwise herein provided. The date of the certificate shall be the date of the commencement of the examination, and in the event examinations are conducted separately or over a period of days, then the five-day (5) period above referred to (unless otherwise expressly provided) shall be measured from the date of the commencement of the first examination. All certificates shall contain the observations upon which judgments are based, and shall contain other information as the director may by rule or regulation require.

Rights of patients. No patient admitted or certified to any facility under any provision of this chapter shall be deprived of any constitutional, civil, or legal right, solely by reason of such admission or certification nor shall the certification or admission modify or vary any constitutional or civil right, including, but not limited to, the right or rights:

To privacy and dignity;

To civil service or merit rating or ranking and appointment;

Relating to the granting, forfeiture or denial of a license, permit, privilege, or benefit pursuant to any law;

To religious freedom;

To be visited privately at all reasonable times by his or her personal physician, attorney, and clergyperson, and by other persons at all reasonable times unless the official in charge of the facility determines either that a visit by any of the other persons or a particular visitation time would not be in the best interests of the patient and he or she incorporates a statement for any denial of visiting rights in the individualized treatment record of the patient;

To be provided with stationery, writing materials, and postage in reasonable amounts and to have free unrestricted, unopened, and uncensored use of the mails for letters;

To wear one’s own clothes, keep and use personal possessions, including toilet articles; to keep and be allowed to spend a reasonable sum of money for canteen expenses and small purchases; to have access to individual storage space for the person’s private use; and reasonable access to telephones to make and receive confidential calls; provided, however, that any of these rights may be denied for good cause by the official in charge of a facility or a physician designated by him or her. A statement of the reasons for any denial shall be entered in the individualized treatment record of the patient;

To seek independent psychiatric examination and opinion from a psychiatrist or mental health professional of the patient’s choice;

To be employed at a gainful occupation insofar as the patient’s condition permits, provided however, that no patient shall be required to perform labor;

To vote and participate in political activity;

To receive and read literature;

To have the least possible restraint imposed upon the person consistent with affording him or her the care and treatment necessary and appropriate to the patient’s condition;

To have access to the mental health advocate upon request;

To prevent release of his or her name to the advocate or next of kin by signing a form provided to all patients for that purpose at the time of admission.

Records. A facility shall maintain for each patient admitted pursuant to this chapter, a comprehensive medical record. The record shall contain a recorded, individualized treatment plan, which shall at least monthly be reviewed by the physician of the facility who is chiefly responsible for the patient’s care, notations of the reviews to be entered in the record. The records shall also contain information indicating at the time of admission or certification what alternatives to admission or certification are available to the patient; what alternatives have been investigated; and why the investigated alternatives were not deemed suitable. The medical record shall further contain other information as the director may by rule or regulation require.

Competence. A person shall not, solely by reason of the person’s admission or certification to a facility for examination or care and treatment under the provisions of this chapter, thereby be deemed incompetent to manage the person’s affairs; to contract; to hold or seek a professional, occupational, or vehicle operator’s license; to make a will; or for any other purpose. Neither shall any requirement be made, by rule, regulation, or otherwise, as a condition to admission and retention, that any person applying for admission shall have the legal capacity to contract, it being sufficient for the purpose, that the person understand the nature and consequence of making the application.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 100, § 1; P.L. 1968, ch. 168, § 2; G.L. 1956, § 40-20-6; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; G.L. 1956, §

40.1-5-6

; P.L. 1974, ch. 119, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 203, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 215, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 136; P.L. 2022, ch. 231, art. 11, § 7, effective June 27, 2022.

40.1-5-6.
Voluntary admission.

General. Any individual of lawful age may apply for voluntary admission to any facility provided for by this law seeking care and treatment for alleged psychiatric disability. The application shall be in writing, signed by the applicant in the presence of at least one witness, who shall attest to the application by placing his or her name and address thereon. If the applicant has not yet attained his or her eighteenth (18th) birthday, the application shall be signed by the applicant and the applicant’s parent, guardian, or next of kin.

Admission of children. Any person who is under the age of eighteen (18) and who receives medical benefits funded in whole or in part by either the department of children, youth and families or by the department of human services may be admitted to any facility provided for by this chapter seeking care and treatment for alleged psychiatric disability only after an initial mental health crisis intervention is completed by a provider who is licensed by the department of children, youth and families for emergency services, has proper credentials, and is contracted with the RIte Care health plan or the state and the provider, after considering alternative services to hospitalization with the child, family, and other providers, requests prior authorization for the admission from a representative of the child and family’s insurance company or utilization review organization representing the insurance company. If the inpatient hospital admits a child without the crisis intervention and prior authorization from the insurance company or utilization review organization, the hospital will be paid a rate equivalent to an Administratively Necessary Day (AND) for each day that the insurance company or utilization review organization representing the insurance company determines that the child did not meet the inpatient level-of-care criteria. The state shall ensure that this provision is included in all publicly financed contracts and agreements for behavioral health services. Activities conducted pursuant to this section shall be exempt from the provisions of § 23-17.12 [repealed], but shall be subject to the provisions of subsection (b) of this section.

The department of human services shall develop regulations for emergency admissions that would allow the admitting hospital to maintain its compliance with the provisions of the act while meeting the need of the child.

Period of treatment. If it is determined that the applicant is in need of care and treatment for psychiatric disability and no suitable alternatives to admission are available, he or she shall be admitted for a period not to exceed thirty (30) days. Successive applications for continued voluntary status may be made for successive periods not to exceed ninety (90) days each, so long as care and treatment is deemed necessary and documented in accordance with the requirements of this chapter and no suitable alternatives to admission are available.

Discharge.

A voluntary patient shall be discharged no later than the end of the business day following of the patient’s presenting a written notice of the patient’s intent to leave the facility to the medical official in charge or the medical official designated by the medical official in charge, unless that official or another qualified person from the facility files an application for the patient’s civil court certification pursuant to §

40.1-5-8

. The notice shall be on a form prescribed by the director and made available to all patients at all times. If a decision to file an application for civil court certification is made, the patient concerned and the patient’s legal guardian(s), if any, shall receive immediately, but in no event later than twelve (12) hours from the making of the decision, notice of the intention from the official in charge of the facility, or the official’s designee, and the patient may, in the discretion of the official, be detained for an additional period not to exceed two (2) business days, pending the filing and setting down for hearing of the application under §

40.1-5-8

.

A voluntary patient who gives notice of the patient’s intention or desire to leave the facility may at any time during the period of the patient’s hospitalization prior to any certification pursuant to § 40.1-5-8, following the giving of the notice, submit a written communication withdrawing the notice, whereby the patient’s voluntary status shall be considered to continue unchanged until the expiration of thirty (30) or ninety (90) days as provided in subsection (b) of this section. In the case of an individual under eighteen (18) years of age, the notice or withdrawal of notice may be given by either of the persons who made the application for the patient’s admission, or by a person of equal or closer relationship to the patient, who shall, as well, receive notice from the official in charge indicating a decision to present an application for civil court certification. The official may in the official’s discretion refuse to discharge the patient upon notice given by any person other than the person who made the application, and in the event of such a refusal, the person giving notice may apply to a justice of the family court for release of the patient.

Examination at facility. The medical official in charge of a facility shall ensure that all voluntary patients receive preliminary physical and psychiatric examinations within twenty-four (24) hours of admission. Furthermore, a complete psychiatric examination shall be conducted to determine whether the person qualifies for care and treatment under the provisions of this chapter. The examination shall begin within forty-eight (48) hours of admission and shall be concluded as soon as practicable, but in no case shall extend beyond five (5) days. The examination shall include an investigation with the prospective patient of: (1) What alternatives for admission are available and (2) Why those alternatives are not suitable. The alternatives for admission investigated and reasons for unsuitability, if any, shall be recorded on the patient’s record. If it is determined that the patient does not belong to the voluntary class in that a suitable alternative to admission is available, or is otherwise ineligible for care and treatment, he or she shall be discharged.

Rights of voluntary patients. A voluntary patient shall be informed, in writing, of the patient’s status and rights as a voluntary patient immediately upon the patient’s admission, and again at the time of the patient’s periodic review(s) as provided in §

40.1-5-10

, including the patient’s rights pursuant to §

40.1-5-5(f)

. Blank forms for purposes of indicating an intention or desire to leave a facility shall be available at all times and on and in all wards and segments of a facility wherein voluntary patients may reside.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 100, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 40-20-7; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; G.L. 1956, §

40.1-5-7

; P.L. 1974, ch. 119, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 215, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 136; P.L. 2005, ch. 400, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 597, § 2; P.L. 2022, ch. 231, art. 11, § 7, effective June 27, 2022.

40.1-5-7.
Emergency certification.

Applicants.

Any physician who, after examining a person, has reason to believe that the person is in need of immediate care and treatment, and is one whose continued unsupervised presence in the community would create an imminent likelihood of serious harm by reason of psychiatric disability, may apply at a facility for the emergency certification of the person thereto. The medical director, or any other physician employed by the proposed facility for certification, may apply under this subsection if no other physician is available and the medical director or physician certifies this fact. If an examination is not possible because of the emergency nature of the case and because of the refusal of the person to consent to the examination, the applicant on the basis of his or her observation may determine, in accordance with the above, that emergency certification is necessary and may apply therefor. In the event that no physician is available, a qualified mental health professional who believes the person to be in need of immediate care and treatment, and one whose continued unsupervised presence in the community would create an imminent likelihood of serious harm by reason of psychiatric disability, may make the application for emergency certification to a facility. Application shall in all cases be made to the facility that, in the judgment of the applicant at the time of application, would impose the least restraint on the liberty of the person consistent with affording the person the care and treatment necessary and appropriate to the person’s condition.

Whenever an applicant who is not employed by a community mental health center established pursuant to chapter 8.5 of this title, has reason to believe that either the Rhode Island state psychiatric hospital or the Eleanor Slater hospital is the appropriate facility for the person, the application shall be directed to the community mental health center that serves the area in which the person resides, if the person is a Rhode Island resident, or the area in which the person is physically present, if a nonresident, and the qualified mental health professional(s) at the center shall make the final decision on the application to either the Rhode Island state psychiatric hospital or the Eleanor Slater hospital or may determine whether some other disposition should be made.

Applications. An application for certification hereunder shall be in writing and filed with the facility to which admission is sought. The application shall be executed within five (5) days prior to the date of filing and shall state that it is based upon a personal observation of the prospective patient by the applicant within the five-day (5) period. It shall include a description of the applicant’s credentials and the behavior that constitutes the basis for his or her judgment that the prospective patient is in need of immediate care and treatment and that a likelihood of serious harm by reason of psychiatric disability exists, and shall include, as well, any other relevant information that may assist the admitting physician at the facility to which application is made. The application shall state whether the facility, in the judgment of the applicant at the time of application, would impose the least restraint on the liberty of the person consistent with affording him or her the care and treatment necessary and appropriate to his or her condition. Whenever practicable, prior to transporting or arranging for the transporting of a prospective patient to a facility, the applicant shall telephone or otherwise communicate with the facility to describe the circumstances and known clinical history to determine whether it is the proper facility to receive the person, and to give notice of any restraint to be used or to determine whether restraint is necessary.

Confirmation; discharge; transfer. Within one hour after reception at a facility, the person regarding whom an application has been filed under this section shall be seen by a physician. As soon as possible, but in no event later than twenty-four (24) hours after reception, a preliminary examination and evaluation of the person by a psychiatrist or a physician under the psychiatrist’s supervision shall begin. The psychiatrist shall not be an applicant hereunder. The preliminary examination and evaluation shall be completed within seventy-two (72) hours from its inception by the psychiatrist. If the psychiatrist determines that the patient is not a candidate for emergency certification, the patient shall be discharged. If the psychiatrist(s) determines that the person who is the subject of the application is in need of immediate care and treatment and is one whose continued unsupervised presence in the community would create an imminent likelihood of serious harm by reason of psychiatric disability, the psychiatrist shall confirm the admission for care and treatment under this section of the person to the facility, provided the facility is one that would impose the least restraint on the liberty of the person consistent with affording the person the care and treatment necessary and appropriate to the person’s condition and that no suitable alternatives to certification are available. If at any time the official in charge of a facility, or the official’s designee, determines that the person is not in need of immediate care and treatment, or is not one whose continued unsupervised presence in the community would create an imminent likelihood of serious harm by reason of psychiatric disability, or suitable alternatives to certification are available, the official shall immediately discharge the person. In addition, the official may arrange to transfer the person to an appropriate facility if the facility to which he or she has been certified is not one that imposes the least restraint on the liberty of the person consistent with affording him or her the care and treatment necessary and appropriate to his or her condition.

Custody. Upon the request of an applicant under this section, to be confirmed in writing, it shall be the duty of any peace officer of this state or of any governmental subdivision thereof to whom request has been made, to take into custody and immediately transport the person to the designated facility for admission thereto.

Ex parte court order. An applicant under this section may present a petition to any judge of the district court or any justice of the family court, in the case of a person who is the subject of an application who has not yet attained his or her eighteenth birthday, for a warrant directed to any peace officer of the state or any governmental subdivision thereof to take into custody the person who is the subject of the application and immediately transport the person to a designated facility. The application shall set forth that the person who is to be certified is in need of immediate care and treatment and the person’s continued unsupervised presence in the community would create an imminent likelihood of serious harm by reason of psychiatric disability, and the reasons why an order directing a peace officer to transport the person to a designated facility is necessary.

Notification of rights. No person shall be certified to a facility under the provisions of this section unless appropriate opportunity is given to apply for voluntary admission under the provisions of §

40.1-5-6

and unless the person, or a parent, guardian, or next of kin, has been informed, in writing, on a form provided by the department, by the official in charge of the facility: (1) That he or she has a right to the voluntary admission; (2) That a person cannot be certified until all available alternatives to certification have been investigated and determined to be unsuitable; and (3) That the period of hospitalization or treatment in a facility cannot exceed ten (10) days under this section, except as provided in subsection (g) of this section.

Period of treatment. A person shall be discharged no later than ten (10) days measured from the date of his or her admission under this section, unless an application for a civil court certification has been filed and set down for a hearing under the provisions of §

40.1-5-8

, or the person remains as a voluntary patient pursuant to §

40.1-5-6

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 119, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 140, § 19; P.L. 1976, ch. 203, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 215, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 242, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 66, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 387, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 428, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 231, art. 11, § 7, effective June 27, 2022.

40.1-5-7.1.
Emergency transportation by police.

Any police officer may take an individual into protective custody and take or cause the person to be taken to an emergency room of any hospital, by way of emergency vehicle, if the officer has reason to believe that:

The individual is in need of immediate care and treatment, and is one whose continued unsupervised presence in the community would create an imminent likelihood of serious harm by reason of psychiatric disability if allowed to be at liberty pending examination by a licensed physician; or

The individual is in need of immediate assistance due to psychiatric disability and requests the assistance.

The officer making the determination to transport will document the reason for the decision in a police report and travel with the individual to the hospital to relay the reason for transport to the attending medical staff.

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 387, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 428, § 2; P.L. 2022, ch. 231, art. 11, § 7, effective June 27, 2022.